Illinois, session 104th, HB3281.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 5amended by changing Section 304 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 60/304)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2313-4)7    Sec. 304. Assistance by law enforcement officers. 8    (a) Whenever a law enforcement officer has reason to 9believe that a person has been abused, neglected, or exploited 10by a family or household member, the officer shall immediately 11use all reasonable means to prevent further abuse, neglect, or 12exploitation, including: 13        (1) Arresting the abusing, neglecting, and exploiting 14    party, if where appropriate. However, if the alleged 15    offender is a juvenile, then the officer, based on the 16    totality of the circumstances and using the Adolescent 17    Domestic Battery Typology Tool, may choose not to arrest 18    the juvenile and instead may divert the juvenile or may 19    assist the juvenile and the juvenile's family in finding 20    alternative placement. In any situation in which law 21    enforcement does not make an arrest under this Act, the 22    officer shall forward the report of the incident to the 23    State's Attorney's office for review;   HB3281 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10429 JRC 20504 b1        (2) If there is probable cause to believe that 2    particular weapons were used to commit the incident of 3    abuse, subject to constitutional limitations, seizing and 4    taking inventory of the weapons; 5        (3) Accompanying the victim of abuse, neglect, or 6    exploitation to his or her place of residence for a 7    reasonable period of time to remove necessary personal 8    belongings and possessions; 9        (4) Offering the victim of abuse, neglect, or 10    exploitation immediate and adequate information (written 11    in a language appropriate for the victim or in Braille or 12    communicated in appropriate sign language), which shall 13    include a summary of the procedures and relief available 14    to victims of abuse under subsection (c) of Section 217 15    and the officer's name and badge number; 16        (5) Providing the victim with one referral to an 17    accessible service agency; 18        (6) Advising the victim of abuse about seeking medical 19    attention and preserving evidence (specifically including 20    photographs of injury or damage and damaged clothing or 21    other property); and 22        (7) Providing or arranging accessible transportation 23    for the victim of abuse (and, at the victim's request, any 24    minors or dependents in the victim's care) to a medical 25    facility for treatment of injuries or to a nearby place of 26    shelter or safety; or, after the close of court business   HB3281 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10429 JRC 20504 b1    hours, providing or arranging for transportation for the 2    victim (and, at the victim's request, any minors or 3    dependents in the victim's care) to the nearest available 4    circuit judge or associate judge so the victim may file a 5    petition for an emergency order of protection under 6    subsection (c) of Section 217. When a victim of abuse 7    chooses to leave the scene of the offense, it shall be 8    presumed that it is in the best interests of any minors or 9    dependents in the victim's care to remain with the victim 10    or a person designated by the victim, rather than to 11    remain with the abusing party.12    (b) Whenever a law enforcement officer does not exercise 13arrest powers or otherwise initiate criminal proceedings, the 14officer shall: 15        (1) Make a police report of the investigation of any 16    bona fide allegation of an incident of abuse, neglect, or 17    exploitation and the disposition of the investigation, in 18    accordance with subsection (a) of Section 303; 19        (2) Inform the victim of abuse neglect, or 20    exploitation of the victim's right to request that a 21    criminal proceeding be initiated where appropriate, 22    including specific times and places for meeting with the 23    State's Attorney's office, a warrant officer, or other 24    official in accordance with local procedure; and 25        (3) Advise the victim of the importance of seeking 26    medical attention and preserving evidence (specifically   HB3281 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10429 JRC 20504 b1    including photographs of injury or damage and damaged 2    clothing or other property).3    (c) Except as provided by Section 24-6 of the Criminal 4Code of 2012 or under a court order, any weapon seized under 5subsection (a)(2) shall be returned forthwith to the person 6from whom it was seized when it is no longer needed for 7evidentiary purposes.8(Source: P.A. 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 90 days 10after becoming law.